Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 4

Local Government Modernization Act of 2005

9-3-401. Short title.

In order to ensure local governments in Tennessee maintain adequate accounting records and comply with generally accepted accounting principles for financial accounting and reporting, there is hereby created the “Local Government Modernization Act of 2005.”

Acts 2005, ch. 191, § 1.

9-3-402. Determination of local governments not in compliance with accounting and financial reporting standards — Development of work plan.

The comptroller of the treasury shall determine those local governments that are in noncompliance with the accounting and financial reporting standards established by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board (GASB). Those governments determined to be in noncompliance with GASB accounting and financial reporting standards shall be required to submit an implementation work plan to the comptroller of the treasury on a date prescribed by the comptroller. The chief executive officer of the local government shall serve as the primary person with authority and responsibility for development and submission of the local government's work plan, which shall include the primary government and all component units of the local government. The work plan shall include due dates and responsible persons or parties for implementation.

Acts 2005, ch. 191, § 1; 2018, ch. 499, § 1.

9-3-403. Assistance to develop work plan.

If a local government fails to submit a work plan by the date prescribed, the comptroller shall provide assistance to the local government to develop a work plan within sixty (60) days of the date the plan should have been filed. If the local government does not agree to a work plan within this sixty-day period, the comptroller shall provide a work plan that meets the requirements for implementation.

Acts 2005, ch. 191, § 1; 2018, ch. 499, § 2.

9-3-404. Penalties and restrictions for failure to implement accounting and financial reporting standards.

If a local government fails to implement accounting and financial reporting standards as required by the GASB, as determined by the comptroller, the following penalties or restrictions may be imposed on the noncomplying local government:

The local government shall not be eligible for economic and community development grants funded by the state and administered by the department of economic and community development as mutually agreed upon by the comptroller and the commissioner of economic and community development, and bank excise tax and Hall income tax revenues that are collected and distributed by the state shall be reduced to an amount agreed upon by the comptroller and the commissioner of revenue, but not to exceed five percent (5%) of the total amount due the local government in any fiscal year, until the local government is in compliance with accounting and financial reporting standards required by the GASB;

If a school district, defined as a county, municipal or special school district or system, fails to comply, the school district shall not be eligible for certain state funded education grants administered by the department of education until the school district complies with accounting and financial reporting standards required by the GASB. The comptroller and the commissioner of education shall mutually agree to the categories of grants subject to this restriction; and

If a county highway department fails to comply, the comptroller and the commissioner of revenue shall agree on an amount whereby the funds that the county highway fund would otherwise receive from state gasoline tax proceeds as allocated pursuant to § 67-3-901 shall be reduced. After such amount is agreed upon, the department of revenue shall make the reductions from the monthly allocations of gasoline tax proceeds to the county. The amounts so reduced shall be held in reserve by the department of revenue and allocated to the county upon the county becoming compliant as determined by the comptroller;

The comptroller shall provide the local government with a list of professional accounting firms available to assist in implementation of the work plan. The local government shall provide funds for the cost of this assistance. If the local government fails to provide funds for the cost of this assistance, such cost shall become an outstanding legal obligation of the local government. If the local government fails to pay the cost, the state shall pay the cost and the local government shall be required to reimburse the state; and

In those county governments that fail to implement accounting and financial reporting standards required by the GASB, the comptroller shall review and evaluate the county's financial management system and make a recommendation to the county's legislative body on how to improve the financial management system to facilitate compliance with accounting and financial reporting standards. The county legislative body shall act upon the recommendation of the comptroller within ninety (90) days of notification.

Acts 2005, ch. 191, § 1; 2018, ch. 499, §§ 3-5.

9-3-405. Establishment of audit committee — Notice requirements — Open meetings — Confidential, nonpublic executive sessions.

Local governments are encouraged to consider establishing an audit committee. The comptroller may require that an audit committee be established in any local government in this state that:

Is in noncompliance with the accounting and financial reporting standards required by the GASB; or

Has recurring findings from the annual audit for three (3) or more consecutive years as determined by the comptroller to be a material weakness in internal control or material noncompliance under government auditing standards.

The governing body of the local government shall create the audit committee. The audit committee members shall be external to management and may be members of the governing body, citizens from within the boundaries of the local government, or a combination of both. Members of the audit committee shall be selected by the legislative body. The audit committee shall establish responsibilities and duties that are stated in a resolution approved by the legislative body. The responsibilities and duties, at a minimum, shall address financial and other reporting practices, internal control, compliance with laws and regulations, and ethics. The resolution, or any subsequent amendments to the resolution, creating the duties and responsibilities of the audit committee shall be submitted to the comptroller prior to approval by the legislative body. The comptroller shall review the proposed resolution, or any subsequent amendments to the resolution, and report back to the local government on whether the resolution, or subsequent amendments to the resolution, follows recommended guidelines for an audit committee. The resolution, or subsequent amendments to the resolution, adopted by the legislative body must conform to the report issued by the comptroller. Notwithstanding the requirements of this subsection (b), if an audit committee was created by the legislative body of a county whose charter requires charter changes to be approved in a referendum, and if such actions occurred and were approved in a referendum prior to January 1, 2011, then such an audit committee shall be considered created pursuant to this part.

Except as provided in subsection (d), all meetings of an audit committee created pursuant to this chapter shall abide by the notice requirements adhered to by the local government to which the audit committee is attached.

All meetings of an audit committee created pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the open meetings provisions of title 8, chapter 44, except, upon a majority vote of those members in attendance for the public portion of the meeting, the audit committee may hold confidential, nonpublic executive sessions to discuss the following items:

Items deemed not subject to public inspection under §§ 10-7-503 and 10-7-504, and all other matters designated as confidential or privileged under this code;

Current or pending litigation and pending legal controversies;

Pending or ongoing audits or audit related investigations;

Information protected by federal law; and

Matters involving information under § 9-3-406 where the informant has requested anonymity.

The presiding officer shall announce during the public portion of the audit committee meeting that no business, other than that described under subdivisions (d)(1)-(5), shall be considered during the confidential, nonpublic executive session by the audit committee.

For purposes of providing notice of a confidential, nonpublic executive session, the agenda must disclose the general nature of the item or items to be discussed as described under subdivisions (d)(1)-(5).

A meeting at which both subject matter open to the public and confidential subject matter will be discussed shall be conducted as follows:

All business relating to subject matter that is public in nature shall be conducted first; and

At the conclusion of the meeting relating to subject matter that is public in nature and upon a successful majority vote to enter into executive session, the chair shall announce to the members and the public assembled that the public portion of the meeting is adjourned and that the remainder of the meeting will concern matters that are confidential under subdivisions (d)(1)-(5). When everyone at the meeting who is not authorized to attend the confidential portion of the meeting has departed, the confidential portion of the meeting shall commence.

Only individuals whose presence is reasonably necessary in order for the audit committee to carry out its executive session responsibilities may attend the portion of the executive session relevant to that person's presence; however, nothing contained in this section shall prohibit the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee from attending or being present during an executive session.

This chapter is not intended to prevent the full governing body of the local government from going into confidential, nonpublic executive session with the audit committee at a regularly or specially scheduled meeting of the full governing body for the purpose of further discussing only those matters as described under subdivisions (d)(1)-(5). All portions of meetings of the full governing body of the local government, where matters described under subdivisions (d)(1)-(5) will be discussed, shall be exempt from title 8, chapter 44; provided, that the full governing body of the local government shall abide by the same executive session notice requirements imposed upon the audit committee by this section, and shall not make a decision or deliberate toward a decision on any matter.

Acts 2005, ch. 191, § 1; 2009, ch. 368, § 1; 2011, ch. 97, § 1; 2018, ch. 499, § 6.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

9-3-406. Establishment of process for confidential reporting of suspected illegal, improper, wasteful or fraudulent activity — Retaliatory activities prohibited.

An audit committee created pursuant to this chapter shall establish a process by which employees, taxpayers, or other citizens may confidentially report suspected illegal, improper, wasteful, or fraudulent activity. If the information provided causes the chair of the audit committee to believe that illegal, improper, wasteful, or fraudulent activity may have occurred, then the chair of the audit committee shall report the information to the office of the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to title 8, chapter 4, part 5. The detailed information received and generated pursuant to a report of suspected illegal, improper, wasteful, or fraudulent activity, shall be considered audit working papers and is therefore not an open record pursuant to title 10, chapter 7.

Section 50-1-304 shall apply to all local government employees. In addition, no local government employees shall suffer any of the prohibited retaliatory actions specified in § 50-1-304 for reporting or cooperating with the audit committee, internal auditors, or auditors from, or approved by, the comptroller of the treasury, or for reporting any facts to the local government to which the audit committee is attached. Any person who knowingly and willingly retaliates or takes adverse action of any kind against any person for reporting alleged wrongdoing pursuant to this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 2009, ch. 368, § 2; 2013, ch. 64, § 2.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

9-3-407. Corrective action plan.

Each local government with one (1) or more audit findings in its annual audit shall submit a corrective action plan to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee in a manner as prescribed by the comptroller or the comptroller's designee that addresses the actions taken or to be taken in response to each audit finding received in the annual audit. The corrective action plan must provide the name or names of the contact person or persons responsible for the corrective action, the corrective action taken or planned, and the anticipated completion date. If the local government does not agree with an audit finding, or believes corrective action is not required, the corrective action plan must state the reasons and justifications for that disagreement or belief.

Acts 2017, ch. 383, § 1.